New Jersey, session 221, A3694.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Section 9-7 of P.L.1950, c.210 (C.40:69A-87) is amended to read as follows: The mayor shall preside at all meetings of the municipal council and shall have a voice and vote in its proceedings.  [He] The mayor shall fill vacancies occurring in the trustees of the public library [and] , in the board of education where the municipality is operating under chapter 6 of Title 18 of the Revised Statutes, and, when a mayor is elected at-large by the voters of the municipality at the regular municipal election or general election, when such appointing authority is prescribed by general law for such terms of office as are provided by law. All bonds, notes, contracts and written obligations of the municipality shall be executed on its behalf by the mayor or, in the event of [his] the mayors inability to act, by such councilman as the municipal council shall designate to act as mayor during his absence or disability.  The powers and duties of the mayor shall be only such as are expressly conferred upon [him] the mayor by this article. (cf: P.L.1950, c.210, s.9-7) 2.    Section 9-18 of P.L.1950, c.210 (C.40:69A-98) is amended to read as follows: Any provision of general law conferring the appointing power or other power upon the mayor or other executive head of the municipality shall be construed as meaning the municipal manager in a municipality governed under this article, and the appointments or the power exercised by the municipal manager in accordance with such provision shall be classified and given the same force and effect as if executed by the official named therein, except that members of the board of education [and] , of the trustees of the public library, and when a mayor is elected at-large by the voters of the municipality at the regular municipal election or general election, whenever required to be appointed by any such provision by any board or official of the municipality, shall be appointed under this article by the mayor, and except that the mayor shall serve as the fifth member of the board of school estimate pursuant to N.J.S. 18A:22-1. (cf: P.L.1981, c.68, s.1) 3.    This act shall take effect immediately.